Alaska, session 34, SB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 14.30.278 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (d) When developing an individualized education program for a student with 05 visual impairment, the school district shall presume that proficiency in literacy is 06 essential for the student to meet the student's annual education goals. An 07 individualized education program for a student with visual impairment must include 08 braille instruction unless it is determined while developing the individualized 09 education plan that other special education services are more appropriate to the 10 student's educational needs; however, the provision of other appropriate services does 11 not preclude the provision of braille instruction. 12 * Sec. 2. AS 14.30.630 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 13 (c) The agency, in cooperation with the department and school districts, shall 14 administer a program of special education services, in addition to the special education 15 services provided by the public school system, that is designed to meet the educational 01 needs of visually impaired children who are at least three years of age but less than 22 02 years of age. The program may provide special materials or services and employ 03 teachers who are not assigned to a specific classroom or special education teachers for 04 visually impaired students. The agency shall assist the department and school districts 05 with in-person training in braille for currently employed teachers of students who are 06 visually impaired. 07 * Sec. 3. AS 14.60.010 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 08 (11) "braille" means the system of reading and writing through touch, 09 which is commonly known as Standard English Braille, Grade 2. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.